en: Rich in iron
bg: Богато на желязо
es: Rico en hierro
fi: Rautapitoinen
fr: Riche en fer
hu: Vasban gazdag
it: Ricco di ferro
nl: Rijk aan ijzer
pl: Bogaty w żelazo
pt: Rico em ferro
sv: Rika på järn
tr: Demir açısından zengin

en: Rich in potassium
bg: Богато на калий
es: Rico en potasio
fr: Riche en potassium
hu: Kálium gazdag
it: Ricco di potassio
nl: Rijk aan kalium
pl: Bogaty w potas
pt: Rico em potássio
sv: Rika på kalium
tr: Demir açısından potasyum

en: In braille
ca: En Braille
de: In Blindenschrift, In Brailleschrift
es: En braille, Producto en braille
fi: pistekirjoituksena, tuote pistekirjoituksena, braillekirjoituksena, braille-kirjoituksena
fr: Produit en braille
he: בברייל
hu: Braille-írással
it: In braille
nl: Product in Braille
pt: Em braille, em braile
ru: В шрифте брайля

en: Incorrect data on label, Incorrect data
ca: A l'etiqueta hi ha dades incorrectes, Dades incorrectes
de: Falsche Angaben auf der Verpackung
es: Datos incorrectos en la etiqueta
fi: etiketissä virheellistä tietoa, virheellistä tietoa
fr: Informations incorrectes sur l'emballage, Informations incorrectes
he: נתונים שגויים על התווית
hu: Helytelen adat a címkén, hibás adat a címkén
it: Dati sull'etichetta errati, Dati errati sull'etichetta
nl: Productgegevens incorrect
pt: Dados incorretos no rótulo, dados incorretos na embalagem, dados incorretos
ru: Неверные данные на этикетке
th: ข้อมูลในฉลากไม่ถูกต้อง

en: Incorrect nutrition facts on label, Incorrect nutrition facts, Informations nutritionnelles incorrectes
ca: Etiqueta amb dades nutricionals incorrectes
de: Falsche Nährwertangaben auf dem Etikett
es: Información nutricional en la etiqueta incorrecta, Información nutricional incorrecta
fi: virheellinen ravintosisältö etiketissä, virheellinen ravintosisältö
fr: Informations nutritionnelles incorrectes sur l'emballage, Informations nutritionnelles incorrectes
hu: Helytelen tápértékadat a címkén, Hibás tápértékadat a címkén
it: Valori nutrizionali errati sull'etichetta
nl: Incorrecte gegevens op het etiket
pt: Dados nutricionais incorretos no rótulo, dados nutricionais incorretos na embalagem, dados nutricionais incorretos, informações nutricionais incorretas no rótulo, informações nutricionais incorretas na embalagem, informações nutricionais incorretas
ru: Неверные данные о составе на этикетке
th: ข้อมูลในฉลากโภชนาการไม่ถูกต้อง

en: Integrated production
es: Producción Integrada
fi: integroitu tuotanto
fr: Production intégrée
pt: Produção integrada
ru: Интегрированное производство

en: Keto, Keto certified, Keto friendly
xx: Keto
el: Κετο, Πιστοποιημένο Κετο, Φιλικό για Κετο, κετοφιλικό
es: Keto, Certificado Keto, Amigable Keto
fr: Cétogène, Certifié Keto, Amical Keto
he: קטו
it: Cheto, Certificato Cheto, Cheto-friendly
pt: Keto, Certificado Keto, Amigável Keto
ru: Кето, Кето-сертифицированный, Подходящий для Кето, кето-дружественный
th: คีโต, ได้รับการรับรองคีโต, มิตรกับคีโต
tr: Keto, Keto sertifikalı, Keto dostu

en: Paleo, suitable for a paleo diet
xx: Paleo

en: Without beef, no beef, beef free, free from beef
fr: Sans boeuf

en: without pork, no pork, pork free, free from pork
fr: Sans porc

en: Kosher, kasher
xx: Kosher
de: Koscher
fr: Kascher, Kasher, Cacher, casher, kacher, cascher, kosher
he: כשר
hr: kasher
hu: Kóser
nl: Kosjer
pl: Koszerny
ru: Кошерное
th: โคเชอร์
tr: Koşer

en: cRc Pareve, Chicago Rabbinical Council Pareve, Chicago Rabbinical Council, cRc
xx: cRc Pareve
fr: cRc Pareve

en: Kof-K
xx: Kof-K

en: Kosher LBD
xx: Kosher LBD

en: MK Kosher
xx: MK Kosher

en: Kosher Supervision of America, KSA, KSA Kosher
he: השגחת הכשרות של אמריקה

en: Orthodox Union Kosher, Orthodox Union, OU Kosher, OU, U, Ⓤ
ca: Unió Ortodoxa Kosher, Unió Ortodoxa, UO Kosher, UO, U, Ⓤ
de: Orthodox Union Kosher, Orthodox Union, OU Kosher, OU, U, Ⓤ
es: Unión Ortodoxa Kosher
he: הכשרות האורתודוקסית המאוחדת, הכשרות החרדית המאוחדת
it: Unione Ortodossa Kosher
nl: Orthodox Union Kosher

en: Manchester Beth Din, Manchester Kosher
es: Manchester Beth Din
fr: Beth Din de Manchester, Manchester Kosher
he: בית דין מנצ׳סטר

en: Kashrut division of the London Beth Din, London Beth Din, KLBD, Kosher London Beth Din
fr: Beth Din de Londres, KLBD, Kosher London Beth Din
nl: Kashrut divisie van de London Beth Din

en: Organized Kashrut Kosher, Organized Kashrut, OK Kosher, OK, Ⓚ
it: Kashrut Kosher Organizzati